Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1101
State Highway Commission; creation; members.

There is hereby created in the Department of Transportation a State Highway Commission which shall consist of eight members to be appointed by the Governor with the consent of a majority of all the members of the Legislature. One member shall at all times be appointed from each of the eight districts designated in section 39-1102. Each member of the commission shall be (1) a citizen of the United States, (2) not less than thirty years of age, and (3) a bona fide resident of the State of Nebraska and of the district from which he or she is appointed for at least three years immediately preceding his or her appointment. Not more than four members shall be of the same political party. The Director-State Engineer shall be an ex officio member of the commission who shall vote in case of a tie.

Laws 1953, c. 334, § 1, p. 1095;

Laws 1955, c. 163, § 1, p. 468;

Laws 1987, LB 161, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 119.